District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.07

Computation of unearned premiums.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 405, ch. 93, title IV, § 7
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1407.
1973 Ed., § 35-1107.